dictionaries/hsb/hsb.dic
desinficěrować/NEX
dołbać/NAX
blokěrować/NEX
žimać/NAX
žohnować/NEX
šćowkać/NAX
šarować/NEX
škrěkotać/NEX
šlahać/NAX
šokěrować/NEX
štapać/NAX
šwiknyć/NZE
łuskać/NAX
abstrahować/NEX
ćiskać/NAX
afinować/NEX
alegorizować/NEX
anonsować/NEX
asfaltować/NEX
błuknyć/NXE
betonować/NEX
bimbać/NAX
bohatnyć/NXE
borkać/NAX
brubotać/NEX
chabłotać/NEX
chileć/NAX
chrymstać/NAX
cizelěrować/NEX
cyrpać/NAX
dešćować/NEX
dehydrěrować/NEX
demoralizować/NEX
difamować/NEX
dožarować/NEZ
dołpać/NAX
dodawać/NAX
dohrawać/NAX
domasać/NAZ
dominować/NEX
dopiskać/NAZ
doražeć/NAX
dorumować/NEXZ
dóstawać/NAX
dowěšeć/NAZ
dowoblěkać/NAZ
dowubrać/NEZ
dowučerpać/NAZ
drjebotać/NEX
dumpać/NAX
dwělować/NEX
čapać/NAX
česać/NEX
eksmitěrować/NEX
čmačkać/NAX
emaljować/NEX
etatizować/NEX
čuwać/NAX
fanatizować/NEX
filtrěrować/NEX
fluoreskować/NEX
frekwentować/NEX
galwanizować/NEX
graněrować/NEX
hałzować/NEX
hamać/NAX
herbować/NEX
hladać/NAX
hospitować/NEX
hrymzać/NAX
humanizować/NEX
imitować/NEX
iniciěrować/NEX
integrować/NEX
izolować/NEX
jěchać/NAX
kampěrować/NEX
kasěrować/NEX
kawkać/NAX
kikerować/NEX
kiwkać/NAX
klukotać/NEX
klumpać/NAX
křesnyć/NZE
kompletować/NEX
konjugować/NEX
kontrahować/NEX
kopać/NAX
korigować/NEX
kritikastrować/NEX
kultiwować/NEX
kunkać/NAX
kwartěrować/NEX
leptnyć/NZE
likać/NAX
lizać/NEX
magnetizować/NEX
masěrować/NEX
metalizować/NEX
měšeć/NAX
mjezować/NEX
mopować/NEX
morskać/NAX
mumifikować/NEX
nabrěmjenjować/NEX
nabywać/NAX
načinjeć/NAX
nahibnyć/NZE
nakować/NAZ
nalěpjować/NEX
namórać/NAZ
napisać/NEZ
napluwać/NAZ
naražeć/NAX
narejować/NEZ
nastajować/NEX
nasykać/NAZ
nawožować/NEX
nazhonjeć/NAX
njebozować/NEX
nygnyć/NZE
oraklować/NEX
palatalizować/NEX
pasteurizować/NEX
perifrazować/NEX
piskać/NAX
pjasćować/NEX
pledować/NEX
pošwikać/NAZ
poběhnyć/NZE
podšiwać/NAX
podjimować/NEX
podpołožeć/NAX
podrěmnyć/NZE
pódušować/NEX
podworać/NAZ
přećišćować/NEX
přechadźeć/NAX
předpisować/NEX
přečinjeć/NAX
přehonjować/NEX
překapać/NAZ
překonstruować/NEXZ
přemačeć/NAX
přemjenować/NEZ
přepasać/NAZ
přepisać/NEZ
přeporcionować/NEXZ
přeradźeć/NAX
přerězować/NEX
přesmykować/NEX
přeswětleć/NAX
přetřasować/NEX
přewarjeć/NAX
přewjedować/NEX
pohibnyć/NZE
pohladać/NAZ
přićahować/NEX
přibiwać/NAX
přičinjeć/NAX
přilěhać/NAX
přilěhować/NEX
připřahać/NAZ
připokazować/NEX
přisłodźeć/NAX
přitowaršeć/NAX
přitwarjować/NEX
přiwołać/NAZ
poklepać/NAZ
pokradnyć/NZE
pomysleć/NAX
poplacnyć/NZE
porejwać/NAZ
poslěbornjeć/NAX
postdatować/NEX
potřěleć/NAZ
powólnjeć/NAX
pozhibnyć/NZE
prašeć/NAX
projektować/NEX
punktować/NEX
referować/NEX
reprezentować/NEX
rjechtać/NAX
rjepotać/NEX
rozćahać/NAZ
rozchadźować/NEX
rozdźěleć/NAX
rozestajeć/NAX
rozklepać/NAZ
rozklučować/NEX
rozměsćeć/NAX
rozpachnyć/NZE
rozpačeć/NAX
rozpójšeć/NAZ
rozrěčować/NEX
rozrywać/NAX
roztłóčeć/NAX
roztočować/NEX
rozwiwać/NAX
rymować/NEX
sćinać/NAX
scentralizować/NEZ
składować/NEX
skedźbnjeć/NAX
skućeć/NAX
skutkować/NEX
smychać/NAX
spadować/NEX
spožčeć/NAX
spokojeć/NAX
sprostnyć/NZE
spytać/NAZ
storněrować/NEX
stwjerdźeć/NAX
suměrować/NEX
tarěrować/NEX
třihać/NAX
torpedować/NEX
tykać/NAX
typizować/NEX
wizitěrować/NEX
woćeńšeć/NAX
wobdźěłać/NAZ
wobdušnjować/NEX
wobjednawać/NAX
wobmasać/NAZ
wobrubować/NEX
wobskoržeć/NAX
wobuwać/NAX
wodybawjeć/NAX
wočaknyć/NZE
wokmanjeć/NAX
womjelknyć/NZE
wonjemdrjeć/NAX
wopjerjeć/NAX
worštować/NEX
worjeńšeć/NAX
wostajeć/NAX
wotłamać/NAZ
wotběhnyć/NZE
wotcydźeć/NAX
wotewzać/ANZ
wotkrawać/NAX
wotličować/NEX
wotmydleć/NAX
wotplacać/NAZ
wotpřahować/NEX
wotpraskać/NAZ
wotsćinjeć/NAX
wotskorjować/NEX
wottrašeć/NAX
wotwołać/NAZ
wotwučować/NEX
wozrodźeć/NAX
wuškrabać/NAZ
wućěkować/NEX
wubuchać/NAZ
wudobywać/NAX
wučwělować/NEZ
wuhnawać/NAX
wujimać/NAX
wuklepować/NEX
wukonjeć/NAX
wulichować/NEZ
wulěhać/NAZ
wunamakać/NAZ
wupalować/NEX
wuperać/NAX
wupřesćěrać/NAX
wuprasknyć/NZE
wupróšeć/NAX
wurunać/NAZ
wusłyšować/NEX
wusprawnosćeć/NAX
wusudźować/NEX
wusydać/NAZ
wuwaleć/NAX
wuwinjować/NEX
wuwostawać/NAX
wzdawać/NAX
zažiwjować/NEX
zaškrobjeć/NAX
zabawjeć/NAX
zabawjować/NEX
zadliwać/NAX
zahnawać/NAX
zahusćować/NEX
zakćěwać/NAX
zakukleć/NAX
zaličować/NEX
zamotać/NAZ
zapadować/NEX
zapimpleć/NAX
zapowědać/NAX
zapraskować/NEX
zarunać/NAZ
zasaknyć/NZE
zaspěwać/NAZ
zasywać/NAX
zatelefonować/NEZ
zawěšeć/NAX
zawróćeć/NAX
zazběhować/NEX
zderdać/NAZ
zdrobnjować/NEX
zeškrabać/NAZ
zesmudźeć/NAX
zewšědnjeć/NAX
zhłodać/NAZ
zhóršować/NEX
zjebać/NAZ
zmotać/NAZ
znječisćować/NEX
zrozdawać/NAZ
zwołać/NAZ
zwopisać/NEZ
zwottorhać/NAZ
